Massachusetts, session 194th, H3893.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. (a) Notwithstanding section 17 of chapter 138 of the General Laws, the
licensing authority of the town of Lexington may grant 10 additional licenses for the sale of wine
and malt beverages to be drunk on the premises pursuant to section 12 of said chapter 138 as
follows: (i) 1 license to Pinot's Palette, located at 7A Meriam Street in Lexington; (ii) 1 license to
Galaray House Art Gallery, located at 1720 Massachusetts Avenue in Lexington; (iii) 1 license
to Lexington Venue Theater, located at 1794 Massachusetts Avenue in Lexington; (iv) 1 license
to Fable Brewing, located at 94 Hartwell Ave Lexington; and (v) 6 licenses to establishments
located within the three economic development zones described in subsection (b). A license
granted under said subsection (b) shall be clearly marked on its face either “Village Overlay
District”, “Multifamily Overlay District”, or “Village High-Rise Overlay District” as applicable.
Licenses granted under this act shall be subject to all of said chapter 138 except said section 17.
of 3

(b) The licensing authority shall restrict the 6 licenses granted under clause (v) of
subsection (a) to establishments located within either the “Village Overlay District”,
“Multifamily Overlay District”, or “Village High-Rise Overlay District” as those areas are
defined on a map entitled “Article 34 Overlay Districts Map” dated March 24, 2023, a copy of
which is on file in the office of the town clerk.
(c) A license granted under this act shall only be exercised in the dining room of a
common victualler and in such other public rooms or areas as may be deemed reasonable and
appropriate by the licensing authority as certified in writing.
(d)(1) The licensing authority shall not approve of the transfer of a license granted
pursuant to clauses (i), (ii), (iii), or (iv) of subsection (a) to any other location, but it may grant a
license to a new applicant at the same location if the applicant files with the licensing authority a
letter from the department of revenue and a letter from the department of unemployment
assistance indicating the license is in good standing with those departments and that all
applicable taxes, fees, and contributions have been paid.
(2) The licensing authority shall not approve of the transfer of a license granted pursuant
to clause (v) of subsection (a) to a location outside of the initial zoned area as described in
subsection (b), but it may grant a license to a new applicant within such initial zoned area if the
applicant files with the licensing authority a letter from the department of revenue and a letter
from the department of unemployment assistance indicating the license is in good standing with
those departments and that all applicable taxes, fees, and contributions have been paid.
(e)(1) If a licensee fails to renew a license granted under clauses (i), (ii), (iii), or (iv) of
subsection (a) or any such license granted under those clauses is cancelled, revoked, or no longer
of 3

in use, it shall be returned physically, with all the legal rights, privileges, and restrictions
pertaining thereto, to the licensing authority and the licensing authority may, within 3 years of
such return, then grant the license to a new applicant under the same conditions as specified in
this act, otherwise such license shall dissolve.
(2) If a licensee fails to renew a license granted under clause (v) of subsection (a) or any
such license granted is cancelled, revoked, or no longer in use, it shall be returned physically,
with all the legal rights, privileges, and restrictions pertaining thereto, to the licensing authority
and the licensing authority may then grant the license to a new applicant under the same
conditions as specified in this act.
(f) All licenses granted under this act shall be issued within 3 years after the effective
date of this act, provided however, that a license originally granted within that time period may
be granted to a new applicant under subsections (d) or (e) thereafter.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 3